Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1261
Water skis, aquaplane, or similar device; collision; operation to avoid.

No person shall operate or manipulate any vessel, tow rope, or other device by which the direction or location of water skis, aquaplane, or similar device may be affected or controlled in such a way as to cause the water skis, aquaplane, or similar device, or any persons thereon to collide with or strike against any person or object, except ski jumps, buoys, and like objects normally used in competitive or recreational skiing.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 61.